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DTC 42 Fuel Tank Select Relay Circuit Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−1 38.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

42

Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue:
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch ON

(Voltage of FPMS terminal is high)
(b) Voltage of FPM terminal is high
(c) Voltage of FPMR terminal is low

SOpenorshort in fuel tankselect relaycircuit
SFuel tankselect relay
SOpenorshort insub fuelpumpcircuit
SSub fuelpump
SShort inmain fuelpumpcircuit (+Bshort)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−1 38.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check fuel tank select relay (See page FI−56).

NG Replace fuel tank select relay.

OK

2 Check voltage between terminal FPMR of engine ECU connector and body
ground (See page DI−1 52, step 1).

OK Go to step 4.

NG

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank change-
over switch and fuel tank select relay, fuel tank select relay and body ground
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness and connector, and
then go to step 8.

OK
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4 Check operation of sub fuel pump (See page DI−1 52, step 5).

HINT:
If youhavenohand −held tester,and thengo tostep5.

OK Go to step 7.

NG

5 Check sub fuel pump (See page FI−1 6) .

NG Replace sub fuel pump, and then go to step 8.

OK

6 Check for open or short in harness and connector between sub fuel pump and
fuel tank select relay (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace, and then go to step 8.

OK

7 Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank select
relay and engine ECU, sub fuel tank forcing driving relay and engine ECU (See
page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace, and then go to step 8.

OK
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8 Check for short in harness and connector between main fuel pump and fuel tank
select relay (+B short circuit) (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness and conector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


